Washington statutes.
RCW 15.19.050

Inspection of facility—Entry—Samples—Search warrant.

The director may enter at reasonable times as determined by the director and inspect any facility and any records required under this chapter. The director may take for inspection those representative samples of ginseng necessary to determine whether or not this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter have been violated. If the director is denied access to any facility or records, the director may apply to a court of competent jurisdiction for a search warrant authorizing access to the facility or records. The court may upon such application issue a search warrant for the purpose requested.

[ 1998 c 154 s 25.]